New York, session 2025-2026, S6657.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (c) of subdivision 1 of section 375 of the vehi- 2 cle and traffic law, as amended by chapter 231 of the laws of 2003, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 (c) Every trailer and semi-trailer weighing more than one thousand 5 five hundred pounds unladen and every trailer and semi-trailer manufac- 6 tured or assembled on or after January first, nineteen hundred seventy- 7 one having a registered maximum gross weight, an actual gross weight or 8 gross weight consisting of the unladen weight and maximum carrying 9 capacity recommended by the manufacturer in excess of three thousand 10 pounds also shall be equipped with adequate brakes in good working order 11 if operated or drawn on the public highways of this state. Every trailer 12 while being drawn upon the public highways of this state shall be so 13 attached to the vehicle drawing the same as to prevent the wheels of 14 such trailer from being deflected more than six inches from the path of 15 the towing vehicle's wheels. On and after January first, nineteen 16 hundred seventy-one every trailer, except a semi-trailer, while being 17 drawn upon the public highways of this state, shall be attached to the 18 vehicle drawing the same by a device of a type approved by the commis- 19 sioner. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09905-01-5